Arkansas, session 2025, HB1386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-26-1122(a), concerning the definitions
to be used in relation to Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 79, and the
assessment of property, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read
as follows:
(6)(A) "Substantial improvement" means an improvement to real
property that increases the assessed value of the real property by at least
twenty-five percent (25%).
(B) "Substantial improvement" does not include necessary
repairs made to real property to remedy damage done to the real property as
the result of a natural disaster except to the extent the repairs to the real
*JLL059*
02-27-2025 10:22:52 JLL059

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1386
property use materials or components, or both, that are of a higher quality
and value than the materials and components used in the real property that
was damaged.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-26-1122(b), concerning the definitions
to be used in relation to Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 79, and the
assessment of property, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The Assessment Coordination Division may by rule define the term
“substantial improvements” and any other term necessary to administer this
subchapter.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-26-1202(a)(1), concerning the procedures
for the valuation of property, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) Each separate parcel of real property shall be valued at its
true market value in money, excluding the value of crops growing thereon.
(B) Only real property located in the state shall be
considered in determining the true market value of residential real property.
(C) Real property located outside of the state may be
considered in determining the true market value of commercial real property
only if there is no comparable commercial real property located in the state.

SECTION 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1-3 of this act are effective for
assessment years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

/s/Cavenaugh











02-27-2025 10:22:52 JLL059